Washington statutes.
RCW 19.100.110

Advertisements—False or misleading—Notice—Procedure.

No person shall publish in this state any advertisement concerning a franchise subject to the registration requirements of this chapter after the director finds that the advertisement contains any statements that are false or misleading or omits to make any statement necessary in order to make the statements made, in the light of the circumstances in which they were made, not misleading and so notifies the person in writing. Such notification may be given summarily without notice or hearing. At any time after the issuance of a notification under this section the person desiring to use the advertisement may in writing request the order be rescinded. Upon receipt of such a written request, the matter shall be set down for hearing to commence within fifteen days after such receipt unless the person making the request consents to a later date. After such hearing, which shall be conducted in accordance with the provisions of the administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW, the director shall determine whether to affirm and to continue or to rescind such order and the director shall have all powers granted under such act.

[ 1972 ex.s. c 116 s 7; 1971 ex.s. c 252 s 11.]